Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 2. Enforcement and Penalties

§ 28.2-1210.
Removal of obstructions or hazardous property from state waters; penalty.

Whenever any wharf, pier, piling, bulkhead, structure, or vessel is found in or upon the bays, oceans, rivers, streams or creeks of the Commonwealth in a state of abandonment, in danger of sinking, or in such disrepair as to constitute a hazard or obstruction to the use of such waterway, the Commission may ascertain the owner of the property and require him to repair or remove the property from the waters of the Commonwealth. If the identity or location of the owner remains unknown and unascertainable after a diligent search and the posting of proper notice at the last known address of the owner, if known, the Commission may have the property removed from the waterways of the Commonwealth after giving notice by publication once in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where such property is located.

It is unlawful for any person who owns a vessel to allow such vessel, for more than one week after delivery of notification by the Commission or a law-enforcement official in person or by United States Postal Service certified mail, return receipt requested, to be in a state of abandonment and in danger of sinking, or in such disrepair as to constitute a hazard or obstruction to the use of a waterway. Upon the occurrence of a natural disaster or other act of God, the Commission or law-enforcement official shall not issue a notification until sixty days following such occurrence. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1974, c. 602, §

62.1-194.1:1

; 1992, c. 836; 1997, c. 258; 1999, c. 544.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-1211.
Injunction against violation of § 28.2-1203.

The circuit court of the city or county in which any act is done or facility or project is found, which is unlawful under the provisions of §

28.2-1203

, shall have the authority, upon application by the Commission, reasonable notice, and after a hearing, to enjoin any further unlawful act and to direct the guilty party or the Commission, at the cost of the guilty party, to remove, tear down or take such other steps as are necessary to protect and preserve the subject property of the Commonwealth.

History.

1970, c. 621, § 62.1-3.1; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-1212.
Monitoring, inspections, compliance and restoration.

The Commissioner may require permittees to implement monitoring and reporting procedures he believes are reasonably necessary to safeguard the property and interests of the Commonwealth protected by this chapter.

The Commissioner may require such on-site inspections as he believes are reasonably necessary to determine whether the measures required by the permit are being properly performed, or whether the provisions of this chapter are being violated. Prior to conducting such inspections, the Commissioner shall provide notice to the resident owner, occupier or operator, who shall be given an opportunity to accompany the site inspector. If it is determined that there is a failure to comply with the permit, the Commissioner shall serve notice upon the permittee at the address specified in his permit application or by delivery at the site of the permitted activities to the person supervising those activities and designated in the permit to receive the notice. The notice shall describe the measures needed for compliance and the time within which these measures shall be completed. Failure of the person to comply within the specified period is a violation of this section.

Upon receipt of a sworn complaint of a substantial violation of this chapter from the designated enforcement officer, the Commissioner may, in conjunction with or subsequent to a notice to comply as specified in subsection B of this section, issue an order requiring all or part of the activities on the site to be stopped until the specified corrective measures have been taken. In the case of an activity not authorized under this chapter or where the alleged permit noncompliance is causing, or is in imminent danger of causing, significant harm to the subaqueous bottoms protected by this chapter, the order may be issued without regard to whether the person has been issued a notice to comply as specified in subsection B of this section. Otherwise, the order may be issued only after the permittee has failed to comply with the notice to comply. The order shall be served in the same manner as a notice to comply, and shall remain in effect for a period of seven days from the date of service pending application by the Commissioner, permittee, resident owner, occupier, or operator for appropriate relief to the circuit court of the jurisdiction where the violation was alleged to have occurred. Upon completion of corrective action, the order shall immediately be lifted.

Upon receipt of a sworn complaint of a substantial violation of this chapter from a designated enforcement officer, the Commission may order that the affected site be restored to its previous condition if the Commission finds that restoration is necessary to recover lost resources or to prevent further damage to resources. The order shall specify the restoration necessary and establish a reasonable time for its completion. The order shall be issued only after a hearing with at least thirty days’ notice to the affected person of the hearing’s time, place and purpose and shall become effective immediately upon issuance by the Commission. The Commission shall require any scientific monitoring plan it believes is necessary to ensure the successful restoration of subaqueous bottoms protected by this chapter and may require that a prepaid contract acceptable to the Commission be in effect for the purpose of carrying out the scientific monitoring plan. The Commission may also require a reasonable bond or letter of credit in an amount and with surety and conditions satisfactory to it securing to the Commonwealth compliance with the conditions set forth in the restoration order. The appropriate court, upon petition by the Commission, may enforce any such restoration order by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy. Failure to complete the required restoration is a violation of this chapter.

The duties of the Commissioner under this section may be delegated to his respective designee; however, the designee shall not be a designated enforcement officer.

History.

1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-1213.
Penalties.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained under this chapter, any person who violates any provision of this chapter or who violates or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any Commission notice, order, rule, regulation, or permit condition authorized by this chapter shall, upon such finding by an appropriate circuit court, be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each day of violation. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained under this chapter, and with the consent of any person who has violated any provision of this chapter or who has violated or failed, neglected, or refused to obey any Commission order, rule, regulation, or permit condition authorized by this chapter, the Commission may provide, in an order issued by the Commission against such person, for the one-time payment of civil charges for each violation in specific sums, not to exceed $10,000 for each violation. Civil charges shall be in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty which could be imposed under subsection A of this section. Civil charges may be in addition to the cost of any restoration ordered by the Commission and shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-2.1; 1960, c. 600; 1962, c. 637; 1966, c. 641; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-3; 1970, c. 621; 1972, c. 866; 1973, cc. 23, 361; 1974, cc. 92, 385; 1975, c. 431; 1976, c. 579; 1980, c. 253; 1982, c. 102; 1988, c. 868; 1992, c. 836; 2000, c. 1056.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1056, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of the act shall take effect on July 1, 2001.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1056, effective July 1, 2001, rewrote the second sentence in subsection A; and added “and shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Marine Habitat and Waterways Improvement Fund” at the end of subsection B.